North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 7. Chronic Disease.

Part 1. Cancer.

§ 130A-205.
Administration of program; rules.

The Department shall establish and administer a program for the prevention and detection of cancer and the care and treatment of persons with cancer.

The Commission shall adopt rules necessary to implement the program.

History.
1945, c. 1050, s. 1; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1981, c. 345, s. 2; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-206.
Financial aid for diagnosis and treatment.

The Department shall provide financial aid for diagnosis and treatment of cancer to indigent citizens of this State having or suspected of having cancer. The Department may make facilities for diagnosis and treatment of cancer available to all citizens.
Reimbursement shall only be provided for diagnosis and treatment performed in a medical facility which meets the minimum requirements for cancer control established by the Commission. The Commission shall adopt rules specifying the
terms and conditions by which the patients may receive financial aid.

History.
1945, c. 1050, s. 2; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1981, c. 345, s. 2; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-207.
Cancer clinics.

The Department is authorized to provide financial aid to sponsored cancer clinics in medical facilities and local health departments. The Commission shall adopt rules to establish minimum standards for the staffing, equipment and operation of the clinics
sponsored by the Department.

History.
1945, c. 1050, s. 3; 1949, c. 1071; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1981, c. 345, s. 2; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-208.
Central cancer registry.

A central cancer registry is established within the Department. The central cancer registry shall compile, tabulate and preserve statistical, clinical and other reports and records relating to the incidence, treatment and cure of cancer received pursuant
to this Part. The central cancer registry shall provide assistance and consultation for public health work.

History.
1945, c. 1050, s. 7; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1981, c. 345, s. 2; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-209.
Incidence reporting of cancer; charge for collection if failure to report.

By no later than October 1, 2014, all health care facilities and health care providers that detect, diagnose, or treat cancer or benign brain or central nervous system tumors shall submit by electronic transmission a report to the central cancer registry
each diagnosis of cancer or benign brain or central nervous system tumors in any person who is screened, diagnosed, or treated by the facility or provider. The electronic transmission of these reports shall be in a format prescribed
by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, National Program of Cancer Registries. The reports shall be made within six months after diagnosis. Diagnostic, demographic
and other information as prescribed by the rules of the Commission shall be included in the report.

If a health care facility or health care provider fails to report as required under this section, then the central cancer registry may conduct a site visit to the facility or provider or be provided access to the information from the facility or provider
and report it in the appropriate format. The Commission may adopt rules requiring that the facility or provider reimburse the registry for its cost to access and report the information in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars
($100.00) per case. Thirty days after the expiration of the six-month period for reporting under subsection (a) of this section, the registry shall send notice to each facility and provider that has not submitted a report as of
that date that failure to file a report within 30 days shall result in collection of the data by the registry and liability for reimbursement imposed under this section. Failure to receive or send the notice required under this
section shall not be construed as a waiver of the reporting requirement. For good cause, the central cancer registry may grant an additional 30 days for reporting.

As used in this section, the term:

“Health care facility” or “facility” means any hospital, clinic, or other facility that is licensed to administer medical treatment or the primary function of which is to provide medical treatment in this State. The term includes health care facility
laboratories and independent pathology laboratories;

“Health care provider” or “provider” means any person who is licensed or certified to practice a health profession or occupation under Chapter 90 of the General Statutes and who diagnoses or treats cancer or benign brain or central nervous system tumors.

History.
1949, c. 499; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1981, c. 345, s. 2; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1999-33, s. 1; 2005-373, s. 1; 2013-378, s. 9.

§ 130A-210.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-33, s. 2, effective May 7, 1999.

§ 130A-211.
Immunity of persons who report cancer.

A person who makes a report pursuant to

G.S. 130A-209

to the central cancer registry shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed.

History.
1967, c. 859; 1969, c. 5; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1981, c. 345, s. 2; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2013-321, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-321, s. 2, effective January 1, 2014, deleted “or 130A-210” following “G.S. 130A-209.”

§ 130A-212.
Confidentiality of records.

The clinical records or reports of individual patients shall be confidential and shall not be public records open to inspection. The Commission shall provide by rule for the use of the records and reports for medical research.

History.
1981, c. 345, s. 2; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-213.
Cancer Committee of the North Carolina Medical Society.

In implementing this Part, the Department shall consult with the Cancer Committee of the North Carolina Medical Society. The Committee shall consist of at least one physician from each congressional district. Any proposed rules or reports affecting the
operation of the cancer control program shall be reviewed by the Committee for comment prior to adoption.

History.
1945, c. 1050, s. 9; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1981, c. 345, s. 2; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-214.
Duties of Department.

The Department shall study the entire problem of cancer including its causes, including environmental factors; prevention; detection; diagnosis and treatment. The Department shall provide or assure the availability of cancer educational resources to health
professionals, interested private or public organizations and the public.

History.
1967, c. 186, s. 2; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1981, c. 345, s. 2; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-215.
Reports.

The Secretary shall make a report to the Governor and the General Assembly specifying the activities of the cancer control program and its budget. The report shall be made to the Governor annually and to the General Assembly biennially.

History.
1981, c. 345, s. 2; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§§ 130A-215.1 through 130A-215.4.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 130A-215.5.
Communication of mammographic breast density information to patients.

All health care facilities that perform mammography examinations shall include in the summary of the mammography report, required by federal law to be provided to a patient, information that identifies the patient’s individual breast density classification
based on the Breast Imaging Reporting and Data System established by the American College of Radiology. If the facility determines that a patient has heterogeneously or extremely dense breasts, the summary of the mammography report
shall include the following notice:“Your mammogram indicates that you may have dense breast tissue. Dense breast tissue is relatively common and is found in more than forty percent (40%) of women. The presence of dense tissue may
make it more difficult to detect abnormalities in the breast and may be associated with an increased risk of breast cancer. We are providing this information to raise your awareness of this important factor and to encourage you
to talk with your physician about this and other breast cancer risk factors. Together, you can decide which screening options are right for you. A report of your results was sent to your physician.”

Patients who receive diagnostic or screening mammograms may be directed to informative material about breast density. This informative material may include the American College of Radiology’s most current brochure on the subject of breast density.

History.
2013-321, s. 1.

§ 130A-216.
Cancer patient navigation program.

The Department shall establish a cancer patient navigation program under the Breast and Cervical Cancer Control Program. The purpose of the program shall be to provide education about and assistance with the management of cancer. At a minimum, the program
shall do the following:

Initially serve breast and cervical cancer patients statewide with the intent of future expansion to all other cancer types.

Employ a multidisciplinary team approach to assist cancer patients in identifying and gaining access to available health care, financial and legal assistance, transportation, psychological support, and other related issues.

Work with an existing cancer service agency that is not affiliated with a particular health care institution so that program clients may have access to any cancer health care facility in the State.

History.
2009-502, s. 1.

§§ 130A-217 through 130A-219.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2. Chronic Renal Disease.

§ 130A-220.
Department to establish program.

The Department shall establish and administer a program for the detection and prevention of chronic renal disease and the care and treatment of persons with chronic renal disease. The program may include:

Development of services for the prevention of chronic renal disease;

Development and expansion of services for the care and treatment of persons with chronic renal disease, including techniques which will have a lifesaving effect in the care and treatment of those persons;

Provision of financial assistance on the basis of need for diagnosis and treatment of persons with chronic renal disease;

Equipping dialysis and transplantation centers; and

Development of an education program for physicians, hospitals, local health departments and the public concerning chronic renal disease.

The Commission is authorized to adopt rules necessary to implement the program.

History.
1971, c. 1027, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

Part 3. Glaucoma and Diabetes.

§ 130A-221.
Department authorized to establish program.

The Department may establish and administer a program for the detection and prevention of glaucoma and diabetes and the care and treatment of persons with glaucoma and diabetes. The program may include:

Education of patients, health care personnel and the public;

Development and expansion of services to persons with glaucoma and diabetes; and

Provision of supplies, equipment and medication for detection and control of glaucoma and diabetes.

The Commission is authorized to adopt rules necessary to implement the program.

History.
1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1257, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1997-137, s. 2.

Evidence-Based Diabetes Prevention Program to Eliminate Health Disparities.

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 11E.5(a), (b), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, Office of Minority Health, shall continue to administer, in consultation with the Chronic Disease and Injury Prevention Section,
an evidence-based Diabetes Prevention Program modeled after the program recommended by the National Institute of Diabetes and Digestive and Kidney Diseases, targeting minority populations.

“(b) By December 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, the Department of Health and Human Services shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division on the status, participant demographics,
cost, and outcomes of the Diabetes Prevention Program authorized by subsection (a) of this section.”

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2017.’ ”

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 39.4, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for,
and activities occurring during, the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 39.6, is a severability clause.

§ 130A-221.1.
Coordination of diabetes programs.

The Division of Health Benefits and the Diabetes Prevention and Control Branch of the Division of Public Health, within the Department of Health and Human Services; in addition to the State Health Plan Division within the Department of State Treasurer;
shall work collaboratively to each develop plans to reduce the incidence of diabetes, to improve diabetes care, and to control the complications associated with diabetes. Each entity’s plans shall be tailored to the population
the entity serves and must establish measurable goals and objectives.

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-78, s. 4B.1(b), effective July 1, 2020.

History.
2013-192, s. 1; 2014-100, s. 12E.7; 2019-81, s. 15(a); 2020-78, s. 4B.1(b).

Evidence-Based Diabetes Prevention Program to Eliminate Health Disparities.

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 11E.5(a), (b), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, Office of Minority Health, shall continue to administer, in consultation with the Chronic Disease and Injury Prevention Section,
an evidence-based Diabetes Prevention Program modeled after the program recommended by the National Institute of Diabetes and Digestive and Kidney Diseases, targeting minority populations.

“(b) By December 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, the Department of Health and Human Services shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division on the status, participant demographics,
cost, and outcomes of the Diabetes Prevention Program authorized by subsection (a) of this section.”

§§ 130A-221.2 through 130A-221.4.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 130A-221.5.
Diabetes education as part of well-child care.

Each physician, physician assistant, or certified nurse practitioner who provides well-child care is encouraged to educate and discuss the warning signs of Type I diabetes and symptoms with each parent for each child under the care of the physician, physician
assistant, or certified nurse practitioner at least once at the following age intervals:

Birth.

Twelve months of age.

Twenty-four months of age.

Thirty-six months of age.

Forty-eight months of age.

Sixty months of age.

History.
2015-273, s. 1.

Part 4. Arthritis.

§ 130A-222.
Department to establish program.

The Department shall establish and administer a program for the detection and prevention of arthritis and the care and treatment of persons with arthritis. The purpose of the program shall be:

To improve professional education for physicians and allied health professionals including nurses, physical and occupational therapists and social workers;

To conduct programs of public education and information;

To provide detection and treatment programs and services for the at-risk population of this State;

To utilize the services available at the State medical schools, existing arthritis rehabilitation centers and existing local arthritis clinics and agencies;

To develop an arthritis outreach clinical system;

To develop and train personnel at clinical facilities for diagnostic work-up, laboratory analysis and consultations with primary physicians regarding patient management; and

To develop the epidemiologic studies to determine frequency and distribution of the disease.

The Commission is authorized to adopt rules necessary to implement the program.

History.
1979, c. 996, s. 2; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§§ 130A-222.1 through 130A-222.4.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 4A. Chronic Care Coordination.

§ 130A-222.5.
Department to coordinate chronic care initiatives.

The Department’s Divisions of Public Health and Health Benefits and the Division in the Department of State Treasurer responsible for the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees shall collaborate to reduce the incidence of chronic disease and
improve chronic care coordination within the State by doing all of the following:

Identifying goals and benchmarks for the reduction of chronic disease.

Developing wellness and prevention plans specifically tailored to each of the Divisions.

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-78, s. 4B.1(c), effective July 1, 2020.

History.
2013-207, s. 2; 2019-81, s. 15(a); 2020-78, s. 4B.1(c).

§ 130A-223.
Department to establish program.

The Department shall establish and administer a program for the prevention of diseases, disabilities and accidents that contribute significantly to mortality and morbidity among adults. The program may also provide for the care and treatment of persons
with these diseases or disabilities.

The Commission is authorized to adopt rules necessary to implement the program.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2.

Part 5A. Men’s Health.

§ 130A-223.1.
Department to establish strategies for improving men’s health.

The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, Chronic Disease and Injury Prevention Section, shall work to expand the State’s attention and focus on the prevention of disease and improvement in the quality of life for men over
their entire lifespan. The Department shall develop strategies for achieving these goals, which shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

Developing a strategic plan to improve health care services.

Building public health awareness.

Developing initiatives within existing programs.

Pursuing federal and State funding for the screening, early detection, and treatment of prostate cancer and other diseases affecting men’s health.

History.
2013-360, s. 12E.7.

Part 6. Injury Prevention.

§ 130A-224.
Department to establish program.

To protect and enhance the public health, welfare, and safety, the Department shall establish and administer a comprehensive statewide injury prevention program. The Department shall designate the Division of Public Health as the lead agency for injury
prevention activities. The Division of Public Health shall:

Develop a comprehensive State plan for injury prevention;

Maintain an injury prevention program that includes data collection, surveillance, and education and promotes injury control activities; and

Develop collaborative relationships with other State agencies and private and community organizations to establish programs promoting injury prevention.

History.
2007-187, s. 3.

§§ 130A-225,
130A-226.

Reserved for future codification purposes.